apertium-ita.ita.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 4
	Entries: 36394
	Sdefs: 82
	Paradigms: 496
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools sort ../apertium-ita/apertium-ita.ita.dix ./ita_sorted

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzẮẰẴĂẤẦẨẬǍÅÅÃÃĄĄĀẢȂẠªÆḆĆĈČČĊĎĐĐḌḌḎÐÐĔĔẾỀỄỂỆĚĚẼĖĖĘḖḔĒƏĞĞĜǦĠĠĢḠȞĦḤḤḪH̱ĬǏĨĮĪĪỈỊİĲĴJ̌ḰĶḲḴĹĽĽŁŁĻḶḺǇṀṂŃŇṄŅṆṈŊŎŎỐỒỔỘǑƟŐÕØØǪṒŌŌỎỌỞỢƠƆºŒŘṘṚṞŚŚŜŠŠṠȘŞṢṢSSSŤȚṬṬṮŬǓŮǗǛǙǕŰŨŪŪỦȔỤỨỪỮỬỰƯŴÝỲŶŸȜắằẵăấầẩậǎååããąąāảȃạªæḇćĉččċďđđḍḍḏððĕĕếềễểệěěẽėėęḗḕēəğğĝǧġġģḡȟħḥḥḫẖĭǐĩįīīỉịı̇ĳĵǰḱķḳḵĺľľłłļḷḻǉṁṃńňṅņṇṉŋŏŏốồổộǒɵőõøøǫṓōōỏọởợơɔºœřṙṛṟśśŝššṡșşṣṣſßťțṭṭṯŭǔůǘǜǚǖűũūūủȕụứừữửựưŵýỳŷÿȝª</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="percent" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="predet" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="detnt" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="hyd" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="org" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="atn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="enc" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="auxser" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pro" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="tn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="n" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="GD" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ND" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="rel" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="nn" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="an" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="aa" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ger" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pri" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pii" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ifi" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="fti" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cni" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="prs" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pis" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="fts" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="lquest" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="web" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="apos" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="guio" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="quot" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="time" 	c=""/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="urls">
  <e>       <re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quotes">
  <e>       <re>"</re><p><l></l><r><s n="quot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>»</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>«</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    
<pardef n="emails">
  <e>       <re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="ip">
  <e>       <re>(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9])(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))(.(25[0-5]|2[0-4][0-9]|[0-1]?[0-9]?[0-9]))</re><p><l></l><r><s n="web"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <re>[’'‘]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? *</re><p><l>%</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>°</l><r>°<s n="num"/></r></p></e> <!-- degree -->
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>º</l><r>º<s n="num"/></r></p></e> <!-- primo, secondo... -->
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>ª</l><r>ª<s n="num"/></r></p></e> <!-- prima, seconda... -->
</pardef>
    

<pardef n="hd-hour">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]</re></e>
  <e>       <re>[01][0-9]</re></e>
  <e>       <re>2[0-3]</re></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-separator">
  <e>       <i>:</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hd-minute">
  <e>       <re>[012345][0-9]</re></e>
</pardef>
  
<pardef n="hour-digital">
  <e>       <par n="hd-hour"/><par n="hd-separator"/><par n="hd-minute"/><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>([.\?;:!]|[\?!]+|...)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>–</l>         <r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
 
<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="separ">
  <e>       <re>[¿¡]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="S__gli">
  <e>       <p><l>lo</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lo</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="S__cantandomi">
  <e>       <p><l>lo</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lo</l>        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>ci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e>                      <par n="emails"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="hour-digital"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ip"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="urls"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="quotes"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separ"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
